District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.11

Massachusetts Avenue through grounds of United States Naval Observatory.

Massachusetts Avenue, as laid down in conformity with § 9-101.10 upon the maps of the engineer department of the District of Columbia, through the grounds of the United States Naval Observatory is declared to be a public street in all respects as the other public streets of the District of Columbia.

Aug. 1, 1894, 28 Stat. 588, Joint Res. No. 40, § 2
1981 Ed., § 7-121.
1973 Ed., § 7-121.